Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 30

Local Government Electronic Technology Act of 2009

4-30-101. Purpose — Short title.

In order to encourage local governments in Tennessee to utilize current electronic technology to perform the business functions of their offices, to ensure the best possible stewardship of public funds and to maintain adequate internal controls, there is created the “Local Government Electronic Technology Act of 2009.”

Acts 2009, ch. 96, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 30, §§4-30-101 —4-30-107 (Acts 1977, ch. 475, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 4-3001 — 4-3007), concerning the governmental study and reorganization commission, became obsolete on January 15, 1981, pursuant to the terms of former §4-30-106, which provided for the termination of the commission on that date.

4-30-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, “local government” means any county, metropolitan government, municipality or other political subdivision of this state.

Acts 2009, ch. 96, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 30, §§4-30-101 —4-30-107 (Acts 1977, ch. 475, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 4-3001 — 4-3007), concerning the governmental study and reorganization commission, became obsolete on January 15, 1981, pursuant to the terms of former §4-30-106, which provided for the termination of the commission on that date.

4-30-103. Use of current electronic technology — Filing of plan before implementing new electronic technology — Contents of plan.

Local governments are encouraged to use current electronic technology to perform the business functions of their offices.

Prior to any local government implementing new electronic technology associated with the disbursement of public funds, purchasing or the sale of local government assets or the collection of various taxes, fines, fees or payments, the local government shall file a plan with the comptroller of the treasury for comments. The plan shall be filed at least thirty (30) days prior to implementation.

The plan shall contain the following information:

A description of the business process and the technology to be utilized;

A description of the policies and procedures related to the implementation of the electronic technology;

Documentation of internal controls that will ensure the integrity of the business process; and

The estimated implementation cost and a statement as to whether the implementation of the new electronic technology will be implemented within the existing operating resources of the office or indicate prior approval of the governing body if additional operating resources are needed.

Acts 2009, ch. 96, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 30, §§4-30-101 —4-30-107 (Acts 1977, ch. 475, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 4-3001 — 4-3007), concerning the governmental study and reorganization commission, became obsolete on January 15, 1981, pursuant to the terms of former §4-30-106, which provided for the termination of the commission on that date.